Hawaii, session 2026, HB1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 78, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§78-    Confidential complaints against public employees; attorney general; annual reports; rules. (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the attorney general shall establish a confidential process for persons who wish to anonymously file a complaint against any public employee. (b)  A complaint shall be deemed properly filed if the complainant provides the attorney general with: (1)  The complainant's full legal name and contact information; and (2)  Any other information deemed necessary by the attorney general. (c)  Except as provided in subsection (f), the attorney general shall review and forward all properly filed complaints to the department that the attorney general deems appropriate; provided that the attorney general shall redact any information that is likely to lead to the identification of the complainant from the complaint.  The attorney general shall act as an intermediary in any necessary communication between the department and complainant to protect the complainant's anonymity. (d)  Upon receipt of a complaint pursuant to subsection (c), the department shall: (1)  Process the complaint pursuant to the department's standard complaint-processing procedures; and (2)  Submit a report to the attorney general describing the disposition of the complaint, including the findings of any investigation conducted and any disciplinary, remedial, or other action taken. (e)  Each public employer and department shall inform its employees and the public of the confidential complaint process established pursuant to this section. (f)  If the attorney general determines that any conduct or situation described in a complaint it receives pursuant to this section poses an imminent danger or threat to the health or safety of any individual or workplace or the public, the attorney general shall immediately notify the department or other state or county agency, as deemed appropriate by the attorney general. (g)  The attorney general shall submit a report on the confidential complaint process established pursuant to this section to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. The report shall include: (1)  The number of complaints the attorney general received in the preceding year; and (2)  The departments' disposition of the complaints. (h)  The attorney general shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 necessary to implement this section. (i)  For the purposes of this section, "department" has the same meaning as defined in section 76‑11." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________